zh-CN: 镲片嘶音机制: 含链条咝音器; 含夹式咝音器; 含磁吸式咝音器; 不含机制（仅镲片）; 预留铆接（预打孔; 铆接（出厂已安装）; 包含咝音珠/珠链; 包含咝音垫; 未安装铆钉）; 其他
ko: 지글 효과 방식: 체인 시즐러 포함; 클립온 시즐러 포함; 마그네틱 시즐러 포함; 메커니즘 포함되지 않음(심벌즈만 해당); 리벳 준비 완료(사전 드릴링됨; 리벳 처리됨(공장 설치됨); 시즐 비즈/볼 체인 포함; 시즐 패드 포함; 리벳 설치 안 됨); 기타
pl: Mechanizm brzęczący: Łańcuszek w zestawie; Łańcuszek na klipsie w zestawie; Łańcuszek magnetyczny w zestawie; Brak mechanizmu (tylko talerz); Przygotowany pod nity (nawiercony; Z nitami (zainstalowane fabrycznie); Koraliki / łańcuszek kulkowy w zestawie; Podkładka w zestawie; nity niezainstalowane); Inne
vi: Cơ chế xèo xèo: Bao gồm chuỗi tạo âm sizzle; Kèm phụ kiện tạo âm sizzle dạng kẹp; Kèm phụ kiện tạo âm sizzle từ tính; Không kèm cơ chế tạo âm (chỉ có chũm chọe); Sẵn sàng gắn đinh tán (đã khoan sẵn; Đã gắn đinh tán (lắp ráp tại nhà máy); Kèm chuỗi hạt/chuỗi bi tạo âm sizzle; Kèm miếng đệm tạo âm sizzle; chưa gắn đinh tán); Khác
hu: Hangmechanizmus: Láncos sizzlerrel; Felcsíptethető sizzlerrel; Mágneses sizzlerrel; Mechanizmus nélkül (csak cintányér); Szegecselésre kész (előfúrt; Szegecselt (gyárilag beszerelt); Sizzle gyöngyökkel/golyóslánccal; Sizzle paddel; szegecsek nincsenek beszerelve); Egyéb
it: Meccanismo sizzle: Catenella sizzle inclusa; Sizzler a clip incluso; Sizzler magnetico incluso; Nessun meccanismo incluso (solo piatto); Predisposto per rivetti (pre-forato; Rivettato (installato in fabbrica); Catenella a palline/beads sizzle inclusa; Pad sizzle incluso; rivetti non installati); Altro
tr: Sizzle mekanizması: Zincirli zil efekti dahil; Klipsli sizzler dahil; Manyetik sizzler dahil; Mekanizma dahil değil (yalnızca zil); Perçine hazır (önceden delinmiş; Perçinli (fabrikada takılmış); Sizzle boncukları/bilyeli zincir dahil; Sizzle pedi dahil; perçinler takılmamış); Diğer
zh-TW: 嘶嘶聲機制: 包含發聲鍊; 包含夾扣式發聲器; 包含磁吸式發聲器; 不含發聲機制 (僅銅鈸); 支援安裝鉚釘 (已預鑽孔; 鉚接式 (原廠安裝); 包含發聲珠/珠鍊; 包含發聲墊; 未安裝鉚釘); 其他
fi: Särinämekanismi: Ketjusizzler sisältyy; Nipsukiinnitteinen sizzler sisältyy; Magneettinen sizzler sisältyy; Ei mekanismia (vain symbaali); Niittivalmis (esiporattu; Niitattu (tehdasasennettu); Sizzle-helmet/kuulaketju sisältyy; Sizzle-tyyny sisältyy; niittejä ei asennettu); Muu
pt-BR: Mecanismo de chiado: Corrente sizzle incluída; Sizzle de encaixe incluído; Sizzle magnético incluído; Nenhum mecanismo incluído (apenas prato); Pronto para rebite (pré-perfurado; Rebitado (instalado de fábrica); Contas sizzle/corrente de bolinhas incluídas; Almofada sizzle incluída; rebites não instalados); Outro
cs: Mechanismus činely: Včetně sizzle řetízku; Včetně nacvakávacího sizzleru; Včetně magnetického sizzleru; Bez mechanismu (pouze činel); Připraveno pro nýty (předvrtáno; Nýtováno (z výroby); Včetně sizzle korálků / kuličkového řetízku; Včetně sizzle podložky; bez nýtů); Jiný
th: กลไกเสียงซ่า: มีโซ่ซิซเซิล; มีซิซเซิลแบบหนีบ; มีซิซเซิลแม่เหล็ก; ไม่มีกลไก (ฉาบเท่านั้น); พร้อมติดหมุด (เจาะรูแล้ว; ติดหมุด (จากโรงงาน); มีลูกปัด/โซ่ไข่ปลาซิซเซิล; มีแผ่นซิซเซิล; ยังไม่ติดหมุด); อื่นๆ
sv: Fräsmekanism: Rasselkedja ingår; Clip-on-rassel ingår; Magnetiskt rassel ingår; Ingen mekanism ingår (endast cymbal); Nitredo (förborrad; Nitad (fabriksinstallerad); Pärl-/kulkedja för rasseleffekt ingår; Rasseldyna ingår; nitar ej installerade); Övrigt
bg-BG: Механизъм за създаване на свистящ ефект: Включена верижка за сизъл ефект; Включена щипка за сизъл ефект; Включен магнитен механизъм за сизъл ефект; Няма включен механизъм (само чинел); Готов за нитове (предварително пробит; С нитове (фабрично монтирани); Включени мъниста/сферична верижка за сизъл ефект; Включена подложка за сизъл ефект; без монтирани нитове); Друг
el: Μηχανισμός sizzle: Περιλαμβάνεται αλυσίδα sizzle; Περιλαμβάνεται κουμπωτό sizzle; Περιλαμβάνεται μαγνητικό sizzle; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται μηχανισμός (μόνο πιατίνι); Έτοιμο για πριτσίνια (προ-τρυπημένο; Με πριτσίνια (εργοστασιακή εγκατάσταση); Περιλαμβάνονται χάντρες/αλυσίδα μπίλιας sizzle; Περιλαμβάνεται pad sizzle; δεν έχουν τοποθετηθεί πριτσίνια); Άλλο
en: Sizzle mechanism: Chain sizzler included; Clip-on sizzler included; Magnetic sizzler included; No mechanism included (cymbal only); Rivet-ready (pre-drilled; Riveted (factory installed); Sizzle beads/ball-chain included; Sizzle pad included; rivets not installed); Other
sl-SI: Mehanizem za šumeč učinek: Vključuje verižico; Vključuje pripenjalno verižico; Vključuje magnetno verižico; Brez mehanizma (samo činela); Pripravljeno na kovice (predhodno izvrtano; S kovicami (tovarniško nameščeno); Vključuje kroglice/kroglično verižico; Vključena blazinica; kovice niso nameščene); Drugo
nb: Sizzle-mekanisme: Sizzle-kjede inkludert; Sizzle-klips inkludert; Magnetisk sizzler inkludert; Ingen mekanisme inkludert (kun cymbal); Klar for nagler (forhåndsboret; Naglet (fabrikkmontert); Sizzle-perler / kulekjede inkludert; Sizzle-pute inkludert; nagler ikke montert); Annet
da: Sizzle-mekanisme: Kædesizzler medfølger; Clip-on-sizzler medfølger; Magnetisk sizzler medfølger; Ingen mekanisme medfølger (kun bækken); Klar til nitter (forboret; Nittet (fabriksmonteret); Sizzle-perler/kuglekæde medfølger; Sizzle-pude medfølger; nitter ikke monteret); Andet
pt-PT: Mecanismo de sizzle: Corrente de efeito 'sizzle' incluída; Sizzler de mola incluído; Sizzler magnético incluído; Sem mecanismo incluído (apenas prato); Preparado para rebites (pré-perfurado; Rebitado (instalado de fábrica); Contas/corrente de bolas incluída; Pad sizzle incluído; rebites não instalados); Outro
ru: Механизм шипения: С сиццлером-цепочкой; С сиццлером на прищепке; С магнитным сиццлером; Механизм не входит в комплект (только тарелка); Подготовлено для заклепок (просверлено; С заклепками (установлены на заводе); В комплекте шарики/шариковая цепь; В комплекте пэд-сиццлер; заклепки не установлены); Другое
fr: Mécanisme de grésillement: Chaîne sizzle incluse; Sizzle à clipser inclus; Sizzle magnétique inclus; Aucun mécanisme inclus (cymbale uniquement); Prêt pour les rivets (pré-percé; Riveté (installé en usine); Perles sizzle/chaîne à billes incluses; Pad sizzle inclus; rivets non installés); Autre
es: Mecanismo de chisporroteo: Cadena de remaches incluida; Remaches con clip incluidos; Remaches magnéticos incluidos; Sin mecanismo incluido (solo platillo); Listo para remaches (preperforado; Remachado (instalado de fábrica); Cuentas de remache/cadena de bolas incluidas; Almohadilla de remaches incluida; remaches no instalados); Otro
sk-SK: Mechanizmus sizzle efektu: Vrátane retiazky sizzler; Vrátane pripínacieho sizzleru; Vrátane magnetického sizzleru; Bez mechanizmu (len činel); Pripravené na nity (predvŕtané; Nitované (z výroby); Vrátane guličiek/guľôčkovej retiazky; Vrátane podložky sizzler; nity nie sú nainštalované); Iné
lt-LT: Sizzle mechanizmas: Pridedamas grandininis žvangiklis; Pridedamas prisegamas žvangiklis; Pridedamas magnetinis žvangiklis; Mechanizmas nepridedamas (tik lėkštė); Paruošta kniedėms (iš anksto išgręžta; Su kniedėmis (sumontuota gamykloje); Pridedami karoliukai / rutulinė grandinėlė; Pridedama žvangiklio pagalvėlė; kniedės nesumontuotos); Kita
ja: シズルメカニズム: チェーンシズラー付き; クリップオンシズラー付き; マグネット式シズラー付き; メカニズムなし (シンバルのみ); リベット対応 (穴あけ加工済み; リベット留め (工場取り付け済み); シズルビーズ/ボールチェーン付き; シズルパッド付き; リベット未装着); その他
nl: Sizzle mechanisme: Sizzle-ketting inbegrepen; Clip-on sizzler inbegrepen; Magnetische sizzler inbegrepen; Geen mechanisme inbegrepen (alleen bekken); Rivet-klaar (voorgeboord; Voorzien van rivets (fabrieksmatig geïnstalleerd); Sizzle-kralen/bolletjesketting inbegrepen; Sizzle-pad inbegrepen; rivets niet geïnstalleerd); Overig
de: Sizzle-Mechanismus: Ketten-Sizzler inbegriffen; Clip-on-Sizzler inbegriffen; Magnetischer Sizzler inbegriffen; Kein Mechanismus inbegriffen (nur Becken); Für Nieten vorbereitet (vorgebohrt; Genietet (werkseitig installiert); Sizzle-Perlen/Kugelkette inbegriffen; Sizzle-Pad inbegriffen; Nieten nicht installiert); Andere
ro-RO: Mecanism de sfârâit: Lanț sizzle inclus; Sizzle cu clemă inclus; Sizzle magnetic inclus; Niciun mecanism inclus (doar cinel); Pregătit pentru nituri (pre-găurit; Nituit (instalat din fabrică); Mărgele sizzle/lanț cu bile inclus; Pad sizzle inclus; niturile nu sunt instalate); Altul
hr-HR: Mehanizam za šištanje: Lanac za sizzle uključen; Sizzler na kopčanje uključen; Magnetski sizzler uključen; Mehanizam nije uključen (samo činela); Spremno za zakovice (unaprijed izbušeno; Sa zakovicama (tvornički ugrađeno); Perlice / kugličasti lanac uključen; Podloga za sizzle uključena; zakovice nisu ugrađene); Ostalo